Louisiana, session 2026, HB1217.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart C-2 of Part II of Chapter 6 of Title 22 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 22:1870.11 through 1870.22, is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
SUBPART C-2. PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER TRANSPARENCY
§1870.11. Legislative intent
A. The legislature declares that the purpose of this Subpart is to do all of the
of the following:
(1) Promote full transparency and accountability in pharmacy benefit
management, including disclosure of affiliated and related entities, financial
relationships, and services provided.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1830 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1217
(2) Address gaps in enforcement, affiliated entity transactions, and self-
funded plan arrangements not fully captured under existing law.
(3) Provide meaningful enforcement mechanisms to ensure compliance.
B. This Subpart shall be interpreted in pari materia with the provisions of
this Title and shall not be construed to limit or replace any requirement therein.
§1870.12. Affiliate and related-entity transparency
A. A pharmacy benefit manager or insurer shall disclose all affiliated or
related entities involved in pharmacy-related services, including the complete
corporate vertical integration structure of all components related to the pharmacy
benefit manager, insurer, group purchasing organization, and manufacturer.
B. A pharmacy benefit manager or insurer shall disclose any affiliated entity
involved in any of the following:
(1) Specialty pharmacy.
(2) Mail-order pharmacy.
(3) Rebate aggregation.
(4) Data analytics.
(5) Utilization management.
(6) Prior authorization services.
C. Disclosures shall include ownership structure, financial relationships, and
revenue flows between entities.
D. Any compensation flowing through an affiliated entity shall be deemed
a pharmacy benefit manager compensation for regulatory purposes.
§1870.13. Administrative services only and self-funded plan transparency
A. A pharmacy benefit manager or insurer administering self-funded plans
shall provide an annual full financial reconciliation to plan sponsors, including
identification of all fees, rebates, administrative offsets, negotiated price concessions,
performance-based price concessions, and affiliated-entity payments. A pharmacy
benefit manager shall disclose all pharmacy benefit management fees in writing and
shall certify annually under oath that all rebates have been passed through to the plan
sponsor as required. All information is subject to audit by the commissioner.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1830 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1217
B. A contract provision shall not do any of the following:
(1) Restrict a plan sponsor's access to claims-level data.
(2) Prohibit disclosure to regulators.
§1870.14. Enhanced claims-level reporting
A. A pharmacy benefit manager or insurer shall file quarterly claims-level
reports with the commissioner and the attorney general.
B. A pharmacy benefit manager or insurer shall file quarterly claims-level
reports with the commissioner and the attorney general. Reports shall include billed
and paid amounts, all direct and indirect remuneration, identification of affiliated
entities involved in each transaction, post-sale adjustments, and any negotiated price
concessions or performance-based price concessions associated with the claim.
Reports shall also include the total reimbursement paid to network pharmacies in this
state, identified by local and non-local pharmacy. All information shall be subject
to examination by the commissioner.
§1870.15. Prohibition on indirect spread and recharacterization
A. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not recharacterize spread pricing
through administrative fees, affiliate payments, data charges, or service charges.
B. Any such recharacterization shall constitute a violation of this Section, and
shall be treated as an unfair or deceptive act or practice subject to all enforcement
authority granted to the commissioner in accordance with this Title, including
restitution, disgorgement, and treble damages where applicable.
§1870.16. Audit and examination authority
A. The commissioner and the attorney general may conduct forensic
financial audits, examine affiliated entities, and review intercompany transactions.
B. A pharmacy benefit manager or insurer shall maintain records sufficient
to trace all revenue streams and identify all sources of compensation.
§1870.17. Enforcement authority
A. The attorney general shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the
commissioner to enforce this Subpart.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1830 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1217
B. The attorney general may initiate civil enforcement actions, subpoena
records, and seek injunctive relief.
§1870.18. Civil penalties
A. If a violation of this Subpart occurs, the attorney general shall impose a
civil penalty of one million dollars per violation. A violation shall constitute an
unfair or deceptive act or practice subject to all enforcement authority granted to the
commissioner and the attorney general, including restitution, disgorgement, and
treble damages for knowing or willful violations.
B. Each of the following constitutes a separate violation:
(1) Each claim involving undisclosed remuneration.
(2) Each failure to disclose affiliated relationships.
(3) Each failure to provide required reporting.
C. Courts may order restitution and disgorgement of profits.
§1870.19. Pharmacy benefit enforcement fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Pharmacy Benefit Enforcement Fund hereafter referred to in this Section as the
"fund".
B. After allocation of monies to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the fund monies transferred, appropriated, or dedicated to the fund.
Monies in the fund shall be appropriated by the legislature to support all of the
following:
(1) Create a publicly accessible transparency portal to publish aggregated
pharmacy benefit manager data derived from reporting provided for in this Subpart.
(2) Establish a restitution mechanism for plan sponsors, patients, or
pharmacies harmed by unlawful pharmacy benefit manager practices.
(3) Provide grants or stabilization payments to independent and rural
pharmacies disproportionately impacted by reimbursement practices identified
through enforcement actions.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1830 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1217
(4) Fund consumer assistance programs to help individuals navigate
pharmacy benefits, file complaints, and recover improperly charged costs.
(5) Reduce the cost of prescription drugs of Louisiana residents.
C. Monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in the
state general fund. Interest earned on investment of monies in the fund shall be
credited to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end
of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
§1870.20. Recovery of costs
The attorney general may recover attorney fees, investigative costs, and
expert fees in addition to all penalties.
§1870.21. Whistleblower protections
A. Individuals reporting violations of this Subpart shall be protected from
retaliation.
B. Whistleblowers may receive up to twenty-five percent of recovered funds.
§1870.22. Anti-evasion clause
A pharmacy benefit manager shall not avoid compliance with this Subpart
through affiliates, subcontractors, recharacterization of payments, or multi-entity
arrangements. Violations shall be treated as direct violations.
Section 2. R.S. 40:2864(D) and (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2864. Duties of pharmacy benefit managers
* * *
D. Disclosure requirements applicable to pharmacy benefit managers and
insurers shall be governed by R.S. 22:1870.11 et seq.
E. Any compensation flowing through an affiliated entity shall be deemed
pharmacy benefit manager compensation for regulatory purposes.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1830 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1217